src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! # Karelian conjunctions

LEXICON conjunctions
!! @LEXNAME@

a+CC:a #  ;
ali+CC:ali # ;
da+CC:da #  ;
eli+CC:eli #  ;
i+CC:i #  ;
ili+CC:ili #  ;
ka+CC:ka #  ;
libo+CC:libo #  ;
šekä+CC:šekä #  ;
sekä+CC:sekä #  ;
ta+CC:ta #  ;
tai+CC:tai #  ;
tahi+CC:tahi #  ;
tahikka+CC:tahikka #  ;
vai+CC:vai #  ;
vaikka+CC:vaikka #  ;
vain+CC:vain #  ;

šentäh+CS:šentäh # ;

što+CS:što # ;
štopi+CS:štopi # ;
štopu+CS:štopu # ;

jotta+CS:jotta # ;
kun+CS:kun # ;
ku+CS:ku # ;
kui+CS:kui # ;

ni+CS:ni # ;
kuni+CS:kuni # ;
još+CS:još # ;
jošpa+CS:jošpa # ;
kuin+CS:kuin # ;
hos+CS:hos # ;
hot+CS:hot # ;
hoti+CS:hoti # ;

jeeseli+CS:jeeseli # ;
jeesli+CS:jeesli # ;
jeiseli+CS:jeiseli # ;
jeseli+CS:jeseli # ;
jesli+CS:jesli # ;
jos+CS:jos # ;

ennein+CS:ennein # ;!CHECKME 20250828

!a	conjunction ;
!ali	conjunction ;
apa	conjunction ;
ašna(ka)	conjunction ;
!eli	conjunction ;
eli	conjunction_paired ;
elikkä	conjunction ;
elämišto	conjunction ;
elämištä	conjunction ;
!hos	conjunction ;
!hot	conjunction ;
!hoti	conjunction ;
!ili	conjunction ;
ilikkö	conjunction ;
itše	conjunction ;
!jeeseli	conjunction ;
!jeesli	conjunction ;
!jeiseli	conjunction ;
!jeseli	conjunction ;
!jesli	conjunction ;
!jos	conjunction ;
!jotta	conjunction ;
jotto	conjunction ;
ka	conjunction ;
kä	conjunction ;
!ku	conjunction ;
!kui	conjunction ;
!kuin	conjunction ;
!kun	conjunction ;
!kuni	conjunction ;
!lipo	conjunction ;
miku(i)	conjunction_komp ;
muuta	conjunction ;
seko	conjunction ;
sekö	conjunction ;
seku	conjunction ;
!sekä	conjunction ;
sini	conjunction ;
!što	conjunction ;
!štopi	conjunction ;
!štopu	conjunction ;
!ta	conjunction_kopulat ;
!tahi	conjunction ;
!tahikka	conjunction ;
tahikko	conjunction ;
!tai	conjunction_kopulat ;
taiko	conjunction ;
to	conjunction ;
toĺko	conjunction ;
tä	conjunction ;
!vai	conjunction ;
!vaikka	conjunction ;
!vain	conjunction ;
voan	conjunction ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
